src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-pieqss_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieʹss e-stem: # Noun 'nest' - full paradigm
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom: pieʹss
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen: pieʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc: pieʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill: peässa
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc: pieʹzzest
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Ess: pieʹssen
     pieʹss+N+Par: pieʹssed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe: [pieʹzztaa, pieʹzztää]
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom: pieʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen: pieʹzzi
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com: pieʹzzivuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe: [pieʹzzitaa, pieʹzzitää]
     pieʹss+N+Der/teqm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: pieʹzzteʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teqm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: pieʹzzteeʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teqm+A+Attr: pieʹzzteʹmes
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Comp: pieʹzztab
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: pieʹzztumus
